Missouri, session 2026, HB2805.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 217.075, RSMo, is repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 217.075, 217.312, and 217.1200, to read as follows:
217.075. 1. All offender records compiled, obtained, prepared or maintained by the
department or its divisions shall be designated public records within the meaning of chapter
610 except:
(1) Any information, report, record or other document pertaining to an offender's
personal medical history, which shall be a closed record;
(2) Any information, report, record or other document in the control of the
department or its divisions authorized by federal or state law to be a closed record;
(3) Any internal administrative report or document relating to institutional security.
2. The court of jurisdiction, or the department, may at their discretion permit the
inspection of the department reports or parts of such reports by the offender, whenever the
court or department determines that such inspection is in the best interest or welfare of the
offender.
3. Department records may be automated and made available to:
(1) Treatment agencies working with the department in the treatment of the offender;
(2) Law enforcement agencies; or
(3) Qualified persons and organizations for research, evaluative, and statistical
purposes under written agreements reasonably designed to ensure the security and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2805 2
confidentiality of the information and the protection of the privacy interests of the individuals
who are subjects of the records.
4. No department employee shall have access to any material closed by this section
unless such access is necessary for the employee to carry out his duties. The department by
rule shall determine what department employees or other persons shall have access to closed
records and the procedures needed to maintain the confidentiality of such closed records.
5. No person, association, firm, corporation or other agency shall knowingly solicit,
disclose, receive, publish, make use of, authorize, permit, participate in or acquiesce in the
use of any name or lists of names for commercial or political purposes of any nature in
violation of this section.
6. All health care providers and hospitals who have cared for offenders during the
period of the offender's incarceration shall provide a copy of all medical records in their
possession related to such offender upon demand from the department's health care
administrator. The department shall provide reasonable compensation for the cost of such
copies and no health care provider shall be liable for breach of confidentiality when acting
pursuant to this subsection.
7. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the department shall
provide to an offender, or to an offender's personal representative, electronic copies of
all medical records related to such offender while in the custody of the department upon
request from the offender or the offender's personal representative. Such electronic
copies shall be provided within thirty days of an offender's request and at no cost to the
offender.
[7.] 8. Copies of all papers, documents, or records compiled, obtained, prepared or
maintained by the department or its divisions, properly certified by the appropriate division,
shall be admissible as evidence in all courts and in all administrative tribunals in the same
manner and with like effect as the originals, whenever the papers, documents, or records are
either designated by the department of corrections as public records within the meaning of
chapter 610 or are declared admissible as evidence by a court of competent jurisdiction or
administrative tribunal of competent jurisdiction.
[8.] 9. Any person found guilty of violating the provisions of this section shall be
guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
217.312. 1. On delivery of the offender to the reception and diagnostic center, he
or she shall be given the opportunity to designate a personal representative.
2. The department shall develop a form for offenders to make a personal
representative designation. Such form, which shall be made available to the offender in
a paper and an electronic format, shall include the personal representative's name and

HB 2805 3
relationship to the offender, mailing address, email address, phone number, and birth
date.
3. The director may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
217.1200. 1. The department of corrections may develop a hospice care training
program within the state prison system. The department of corrections, in cooperation
with the department of health and senior services and the department of commerce and
insurance, may jointly partner in the program to determine the appropriate training for
the purpose of obtaining licensure or certification required for inmates selected to
participate in the program.
2. The department of corrections, the department of health and senior services,
and the division of professional registration within the department of commerce and
insurance shall jointly approve program curriculum for the training of eligible inmates
currently in the custody of the department of corrections. The curriculum shall include
required program credits for each subject and practical skills instruction. Training
shall be provided by a licensed physician, registered nurse, or other appropriately
licensed or trained health care professional, as determined by the department of health
and senior services and the division of professional registration.
3. Upon successful completion of the training program provided for under
subsection 2 of this section, the department of corrections shall issue a program
completion certificate to the inmate. The department of corrections in cooperation with
the department of health and senior services and the division of professional registration
shall develop a process for submission of notice of training completion and application
for licensure or certification to the division of professional registration, as prescribed by
the department of health and senior services.
4. The department of health and senior services, in consultation with the
department of corrections and the department of commerce and insurance, shall have
the authority to promulgate rules for the administration of this section, including
implementation of the curriculum, as provided for under subsection 2 of this section,
and for continuing education or training requirements necessary for maintaining state

HB 2805 4
certification in good standing. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed as establishing a right to
employment for any licensed hospice provider.
✔